src/morphology/roots/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals
!! --------
!! Numerals in UNDEFINED language are numbers.

LEXICON Numerals
! 0
pagh+Num:pagh   # ;
! 1-9
wa’+Num:wa’    #   ;
cha’+Num:cha’    #   ;
wej+Num:wej    #   ;
IoS+Num:IoS    #   ;
vagh+Num:vagh    #   ;
jav+Num:jav   #   ;
Soch+Num:Soch    #   ;
chorgh+Num:chorgh    #   ;
Hut+Num:Hut    #   ;

! 10-90 etc. easy compounds
wa’maH+Num:wa’maH    #   ;
cha’maH+Num:cha’maH    #   ;
wejmaH+Num:wejmaH    #   ;
IoSmaH+Num:IoSmaH    #   ;
vaghmaH+Num:vaghmaH    #   ;
javmaH+Num:javmaH   #   ;
SochmaH+Num:SochmaH    #   ;
chorghmaH+Num:chorghmaH    #   ;
HutmaH+Num:HutmaH    #   ;
wa’vatlh+Num:wa’vatlh    #   ;
cha’vatlh+Num:cha’vatlh    #   ;
wejvatlh+Num:wejvatlh    #   ;
IoSvatlh+Num:IoSvatlh    #   ;
vaghvatlh+Num:vaghvatlh    #   ;
javvatlh+Num:javvatlh   #   ;
Sochvatlh+Num:Sochvatlh    #   ;
chorghvatlh+Num:chorghvatlh    #   ;
Hutvatlh+Num:Hutvatlh    #   ;
wa’SaD+Num:wa’SaD    #   ;
cha’SaD+Num:cha’SaD    #   ;
wejSaD+Num:wejSaD    #   ;
IoSSaD+Num:IoSSaD    #   ;
vaghSaD+Num:vaghSaD    #   ;
javSaD+Num:javSaD   #   ;
SochSaD+Num:SochSaD    #   ;
chorghSaD+Num:chorghSaD    #   ;
HutSaD+Num:HutSaD    #   ;
wa’SanID+Num:wa’SanID    #   ;
cha’SanID+Num:cha’SanID    #   ;
wejSanID+Num:wejSanID    #   ;
IoSSanID+Num:IoSSanID    #   ;
vaghSanID+Num:vaghSanID    #   ;
javSanID+Num:javSanID   #   ;
SochSanID+Num:SochSanID    #   ;
chorghSanID+Num:chorghSanID    #   ;
HutSanID+Num:HutSanID    #   ;
wa’netlh+Num:wa’netlh    #   ;
cha’netlh+Num:cha’netlh    #   ;
wejnetlh+Num:wejnetlh    #   ;
IoSnetlh+Num:IoSnetlh    #   ;
vaghnetlh+Num:vaghnetlh    #   ;
javnetlh+Num:javnetlh   #   ;
Sochnetlh+Num:Sochnetlh    #   ;
chorghnetlh+Num:chorghnetlh    #   ;
Hutnetlh+Num:Hutnetlh    #   ;
wa’bIp+Num:wa’bIp    #   ;
cha’bIp+Num:cha’bIp    #   ;
wejbIp+Num:wejbIp    #   ;
IoSbIp+Num:IoSbIp    #   ;
vaghbIp+Num:vaghbIp    #   ;
javbIp+Num:javbIp   #   ;
SochbIp+Num:SochbIp    #   ;
chorghbIp+Num:chorghbIp    #   ;
HutbIp+Num:HutbIp    #   ;
wa’’uy’+Num:wa’’uy’    #   ;
cha’’uy’+Num:cha’’uy’    #   ;
wej’uy’+Num:wej’uy’    #   ;
IoS’uy’+Num:IoS’uy’    #   ;
vagh’uy’+Num:vagh’uy’    #   ;
jav’uy’+Num:jav’uy’   #   ;
Soch’uy’+Num:Soch’uy’    #   ;
chorgh’uy’+Num:chorgh’uy’    #   ;
Hut’uy’+Num:Hut’uy’    #   ;

! 0th
paghDIch+Num:paghDIch   # ;
! 1st-9th
wa’DIch+Num:wa’DIch    #   ;
cha’DIch+Num:cha’DIch    #   ;
wejDIch+Num:wejDIch    #   ;
IoSDIch+Num:IoSDIch    #   ;
vaghDIch+Num:vaghDIch    #   ;
javDIch+Num:javDIch   #   ;
SochDIch+Num:SochDIch    #   ;
chorghDIch+Num:chorghDIch    #   ;
HutDIch+Num:HutDIch    #   ;

! 10th-90th etc. easy compounds
wa’maHDIch+Num:wa’maHDIch    #   ;
cha’maHDIch+Num:cha’maHDIch    #   ;
wejmaHDIch+Num:wejmaHDIch    #   ;
IoSmaHDIch+Num:IoSmaHDIch    #   ;
vaghmaHDIch+Num:vaghmaHDIch    #   ;
javmaHDIch+Num:javmaHDIch   #   ;
SochmaHDIch+Num:SochmaHDIch    #   ;
chorghmaHDIch+Num:chorghmaHDIch    #   ;
HutmaHDIch+Num:HutmaHDIch    #   ;
wa’vatlhDIch+Num:wa’vatlhDIch    #   ;
cha’vatlhDIch+Num:cha’vatlhDIch    #   ;
wejvatlhDIch+Num:wejvatlhDIch    #   ;
IoSvatlhDIch+Num:IoSvatlhDIch    #   ;
vaghvatlhDIch+Num:vaghvatlhDIch    #   ;
javvatlhDIch+Num:javvatlhDIch   #   ;
SochvatlhDIch+Num:SochvatlhDIch    #   ;
chorghvatlhDIch+Num:chorghvatlhDIch    #   ;
HutvatlhDIch+Num:HutvatlhDIch    #   ;
wa’SaDDIch+Num:wa’SaDDIch    #   ;
cha’SaDDIch+Num:cha’SaDDIch    #   ;
wejSaDDIch+Num:wejSaDDIch    #   ;
IoSSaDDIch+Num:IoSSaDDIch    #   ;
vaghSaDDIch+Num:vaghSaDDIch    #   ;
javSaDDIch+Num:javSaDDIch   #   ;
SochSaDDIch+Num:SochSaDDIch    #   ;
chorghSaDDIch+Num:chorghSaDDIch    #   ;
HutSaDDIch+Num:HutSaDDIch    #   ;
wa’SanIDDIch+Num:wa’SanIDDIch    #   ;
cha’SanIDDIch+Num:cha’SanIDDIch    #   ;
wejSanIDDIch+Num:wejSanIDDIch    #   ;
IoSSanIDDIch+Num:IoSSanIDDIch    #   ;
vaghSanIDDIch+Num:vaghSanIDDIch    #   ;
javSanIDDIch+Num:javSanIDDIch   #   ;
SochSanIDDIch+Num:SochSanIDDIch    #   ;
chorghSanIDDIch+Num:chorghSanIDDIch    #   ;
HutSanIDDIch+Num:HutSanIDDIch    #   ;
wa’netlhDIch+Num:wa’netlhDIch    #   ;
cha’netlhDIch+Num:cha’netlhDIch    #   ;
wejnetlhDIch+Num:wejnetlhDIch    #   ;
IoSnetlhDIch+Num:IoSnetlhDIch    #   ;
vaghnetlhDIch+Num:vaghnetlhDIch    #   ;
javnetlhDIch+Num:javnetlhDIch   #   ;
SochnetlhDIch+Num:SochnetlhDIch    #   ;
chorghnetlhDIch+Num:chorghnetlhDIch    #   ;
HutnetlhDIch+Num:HutnetlhDIch    #   ;
wa’bIpDIch+Num:wa’bIpDIch    #   ;
cha’bIpDIch+Num:cha’bIpDIch    #   ;
wejbIpDIch+Num:wejbIpDIch    #   ;
IoSbIpDIch+Num:IoSbIpDIch    #   ;
vaghbIpDIch+Num:vaghbIpDIch    #   ;
javbIpDIch+Num:javbIpDIch   #   ;
SochbIpDIch+Num:SochbIpDIch    #   ;
chorghbIpDIch+Num:chorghbIpDIch    #   ;
HutbIpDIch+Num:HutbIpDIch    #   ;
wa’’uy’DIch+Num:wa’’uy’DIch    #   ;
cha’’uy’DIch+Num:cha’’uy’DIch    #   ;
wej’uy’DIch+Num:wej’uy’DIch    #   ;
IoS’uy’DIch+Num:IoS’uy’DIch    #   ;
vagh’uy’DIch+Num:vagh’uy’DIch    #   ;
jav’uy’DIch+Num:jav’uy’DIch   #   ;
Soch’uy’DIch+Num:Soch’uy’DIch    #   ;
chorgh’uy’DIch+Num:chorgh’uy’DIch    #   ;
Hut’uy’DIch+Num:Hut’uy’DIch    #   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
